District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.92

Exemption from procurement and merit personnel laws.

The Agency shall not be subject to Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 or Chapter 6 of this title.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 13, 55 DCR 6261